Utah statutes.
31A-17-404.4.   Transition -- Application to reinsurance agreement.
The amendments to this part made in Laws of Utah 2008, Chapter 257, apply to a
cession made on or after July 1, 2008 under a reinsurance contract that has an
inception, anniversary, or renewal date no sooner than January 1, 2009.
